New Jersey, session 222, S162.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   a. As used in this section: "Health care professional" means an individual licensed by this State to administer health care in the ordinary course of business or practice of a profession. b.   Within 180 days following the effective date of this act, the Department of Health shall partner with community organizations to operate a mobile cancer screening program, which shall consist of staffed mobile vehicles deployed to the northern, central, and southern regions of the State. Each vehicle shall be staffed by at least one health care professional who is qualified to perform a cancer screening. The types of cancers which shall be screened and the manner in which the screenings shall be performed shall be determined by the particular medical expertise of the health care professional assigned to the mobile vehicle and the medical devices and supplies which are made available to the health care professional. c. No later than two years after the effective date of this act, the Department of Health shall submit a written report to the Governor, and to the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), summarizing the program and the results therefrom and providing recommendations for legislative action if legislation action is deemed necessary. 2.    There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of Health the sum of $100,000 to effectuate the purposes of section 1 of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire upon the Department of Healths submission of the report, as required pursuant to subsection c. of section 1 of this act.